Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB292.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 224.10-220 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall promulgate[adopt] administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A establishing reasonable
timetables for the issuance of all permits by the cabinet, except those permits for
which a timetable is set out by statute. The timetables shall set specific time periods
for actions to be taken in the consideration of permit applications.
(2) The timetables set forth in administrative regulations promulgated[adopted]
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be [proposed for adoption and ]filed
with the Legislative Research Commission no later than January 1, 1993. In the
event that the timetables required by subsection (1) of this section are not proposed[
for adoption] and filed with the Legislative Research Commission by the January 1,
1993 deadline, the Energy and Environment Cabinet shall cease the collection of
permit fees for all permits for which timetables have not been established until the
required timetables have been proposed for adoption.
(3) The cabinet shall waive the permit fee for any permit not acted upon, either
favorably or unfavorably, in accordance with the established timetables. The
approach of an impending deadline for action on a permit pursuant to the
established timetables shall not be a reason for denial of a permit. However, nothing
in this section shall require the cabinet to issue a permit which would violate this
chapter or the administrative regulations promulgated[adopted] pursuant thereto.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/26/2026 4:43 PM Jacketed